test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-a-verbs_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.
# (20230502: Csilla)

  Verb - рӯпитаӈкве: # Verb 'to work' - full paradigm
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Inf: рӯпитаӈкве
#Active, present tense, indicative, subjective conjugation
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: рӯпитэ̄гум
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: рӯпитэ̄гын
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: рӯпиты
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1: рӯпитыме̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2: [рӯпитэ̄гын, рӯпитэгы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3: рӯпитэ̄г
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: рӯпитэ̄в
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: [рӯпитэ̄гын, рӯпитэгы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: рӯпитэ̄гыт

#Active, present tense, indicative, objective conjugation, single object
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg3: рӯпитылум
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcSg3: рӯпитылын
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg3: рӯпитытэ
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcSg3: рӯпитыламе̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcSg3: [рӯпитылын, рӯпитылы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcSg3: рӯпитытэ̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg3: рӯпитылув
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg3: [рӯпитылын, рӯпитылы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg3: рӯпитыяныл

#Active, present tense, indicative, objective conjugation, dual object
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcDu3: рӯпитыягум
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcDu3: рӯпитыягын
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcDu3: рӯпитыяге
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcDu3: рӯпитыягме̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcDu3: [рӯпитыягын, рӯпитыягы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcDu3: рӯпитыяге̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcDu3: рӯпитыягув
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcDu3: [рӯпитыягын, рӯпитыягы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcDu3: рӯпитыяганыл

#Active, present tense, indicative, objective conjugation, plural object
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcPl3: рӯпитыянум
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcPl3: [рӯпитыянын, рӯпитыян]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl3: рӯпитыянэ
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcPl3: рӯпитыянаме̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcPl3: [рӯпитыянын, рӯпитыяны̄н, рӯпитыян]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcPl3: рӯпитыянэ̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcPl3: рӯпитыянув
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcPl3: [рӯпитыянын, рӯпитыяны̄н, рӯпитыян]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl3: рӯпитыяныл

#Active, past tense, indicative, subjective conjugation
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: рӯпитасум
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: рӯпитасын
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: рӯпитас
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1: рӯпитасме̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2: [рӯпитасын, рӯпитасы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3: [рӯпитасыг, рӯпитасы̄г]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: [рӯпитасув, рӯпитасӯв]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: [рӯпитасын, рӯпитасы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: рӯпитасыт

#Active, past tense, indicative, objective conjugation, single object
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcSg3: рӯпитаслум
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcSg3: рӯпитаслын
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcSg3: рӯпитастэ
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcSg3: рӯпитасламе̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcSg3: [рӯпитаслын, рӯпитаслы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcSg3: рӯпитастэ̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcSg3: рӯпитаслув
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcSg3: [рӯпитаслын, рӯпитаслы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcSg3: рӯпитасаныл

#Active, past tense, indicative, objective conjugation, dual object
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcDu3: рӯпитасагум
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcDu3: рӯпитасагын
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcDu3: рӯпитасаге
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcDu3: рӯпитасагме̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcDu3: [рӯпитасагын, рӯпитасагы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcDu3: рӯпитасаге̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcDu3: рӯпитасагув
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcDu3: [рӯпитасагын, рӯпитасагы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcDu3: рӯпитасаганыл

#Active, past tense, indicative, objective conjugation, plural object
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcPl3: рӯпитасанум
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcPl3: [рӯпитаса̄нын, рӯпитасан]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcPl3: рӯпитасанэ
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcPl3: [рӯпитасанаме̄н, рӯпитасанаме̄н, рӯпитасанме̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcPl3: [рӯпитасанын, рӯпитасаны̄н, рӯпитасан]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcPl3: рӯпитасанэ̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcPl3: рӯпитасанув
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcPl3: [рӯпитасанын, рӯпитасаны̄н, рӯпитасан]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcPl3: рӯпитасаныл

#Active, conditional, subjective conjugation
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1: [рӯпитанувум, рӯпитанӯвум]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2: [рӯпитанувын, рӯпитанӯвын]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3: рӯпитанув
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1: рӯпитануваме̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2: [рӯпитанувын, рӯпитанувы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3: [рӯпитанувыг, рӯпитанувы̄г]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1: [рӯпитанувув, рӯпитанӯвув]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2: [рӯпитанувын, рӯпитанувы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3: [рӯпитанувыт, рӯпитанувы̄т]

#Active, conditional, objective conjugation, single object
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1+OcSg3: [рӯпитанувлум, рӯпитанӯвлум]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2+OcSg3: [рӯпитанувлын, рӯпитанӯвлын]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3+OcSg3: [рӯпитанувтэ, рӯпитанӯвтэ]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1+OcSg3: рӯпитанувламе̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2+OcSg3: [рӯпитанувлын, рӯпитанувлы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3+OcSg3: рӯпитанувтэ̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1+OcSg3: рӯпитанувлув
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2+OcSg3: [рӯпитанувлын, рӯпитанувлы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3+OcSg3: [рӯпитануваныл, рӯпитанува̄ныл]

#Active, conditional, objective conjugation, dual object
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1+OcDu3: [рӯпитанувагум, рӯпитанува̄гум]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2+OcDu3: [рӯпитанувагын, рӯпитанува̄гын]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3+OcDu3: [рӯпитануваге, рӯпитанува̄ге]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1+OcDu3: рӯпитанувагме̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2+OcDu3: [рӯпитанувагын, рӯпитанувагы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3+OcDu3: рӯпитануваге̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1+OcDu3: рӯпитанувагув
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2+OcDu3: [рӯпитанувагын, рӯпитанувагы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3+OcDu3: [рӯпитануваганыл, рӯпитанувага̄ныл]

#Active, conditional, objective conjugation, plural object
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1+OcPl3: [рӯпитануванум, рӯпитанува̄нум]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2+OcPl3: [рӯпитануванын, рӯпитанува̄нын]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3+OcPl3: [рӯпитануванэ, рӯпитанува̄нэ]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1+OcPl3: рӯпитануванме̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2+OcPl3: [рӯпитануванын, рӯпитануваны̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3+OcPl3: рӯпитануванэ̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1+OcPl3: рӯпитануванув
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2+OcPl3: [рӯпитануванын, рӯпитануваны̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3+OcPl3: [рӯпитануваныл, рӯпитанува̄ныл]

#Active, imperative, subjective conjugation
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2: рӯпитэн
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2: [рӯпитэн, рӯпитэ̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2: [рӯпитэн, рӯпитэ̄н]

#Active, imperative,  objective conjugation, single object
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2+OcSg3: [рӯпитэлн, рӯпитэ̄лн]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2+OcSg3: [рӯпитэлн, рӯпитэлы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2+OcSg3: [рӯпитэлн, рӯпитэлы̄н]

#Active, imperative,  objective conjugation, dual object
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2+OcDu3: [рӯпитэгын, рӯпитэ̄гн]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2+OcDu3: [рӯпитэгын, рӯпитэгы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2+OcDu3: [рӯпитэгын, рӯпитэгы̄н]

#Active, imperative,  objective conjugation, plural object
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2+OcPl3: [рӯпитэн, рӯпитэ̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2+OcPl3: [рӯпитэн, рӯпитэ̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2+OcPl3: [рӯпитэн, рӯпитэ̄н]

#Passive, present tense, indicative
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: рӯпитавем
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: рӯпитавен
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: рӯпитаве
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScDu1: рӯпитавеме̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScDu2: [рӯпитавен, рӯпитаве̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScDu3: рӯпитаве̄г
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: рӯпитаве̄в
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: [рӯпитавен, рӯпитаве̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: рӯпитавет

#Passive, past tense, indicative
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: рӯпитаве̄сум
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: рӯпитаве̄сын
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: [рӯпитавес, рӯпитаве̄с]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScDu1: рӯпитавесаме̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScDu2: [рӯпитавесын, рӯпитавесы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScDu3: рӯпитавесы̄г
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: рӯпитавесув
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: [рӯпитавесын, рӯпитавесы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: рӯпитаве̄сыт

#Passive, conditional
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScSg1: [рӯпитанувем, рӯпитанӯвем]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScSg2: [рӯпитанувен, рӯпитанӯвен]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScSg3: [рӯпитануве, рӯпитанӯве]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScDu1: рӯпитанувеме̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScDu2: [рӯпитанувен, рӯпитануве̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScDu3: [рӯпитанувег, рӯпитануве̄г]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScPl1: рӯпитануве̄в
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScPl2: [рӯпитанувен, рӯпитануве̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScPl3: [рӯпитанувет, рӯпитанӯвет]

#Passive, imperative conjugation
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Imprt+Sg2: рӯпитавен
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Imprt+Du2: [рӯпитавен, рӯпитаве̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Pass+Imprt+Pl2: [рӯпитавен, рӯпитаве̄н]

#Present participle
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc: рӯпитанэ
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg1: [рӯпитанэм, рӯпитанэ̄м]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg2: [рӯпитанэн, рӯпитанэ̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg3: рӯпитанэ̄тэ
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu1: рӯпитанэме̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu2: рӯпитанэнэ̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu3: [рӯпитанэг, рӯпитанӭг]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl1: [рӯпитанэв, рӯпитанэ̄в]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl2: [рӯпитанэнэ̄н, рӯпитанэнэ̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl3: [рӯпитанэт, рӯпитанэ̄т]

#Present participle, single object
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg1: рӯпитанэ̄лум
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg2: рӯпитанэ̄лн
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg3: рӯпитанэ̄тэ
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu1: рӯпитанэламе̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu2: рӯпитанэлы̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu3: рӯпитанэтэ̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl1: [рӯпитанэлув, рӯпитанэлӯв]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl2: рӯпитанэлы̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl3: [рӯпитанэ̄нл, рӯпитанэ̄ныл]

#Present participle, dual object
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg1: рӯпитанэ̄гум
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg2: рӯпитанэ̄гн
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg3: рӯпитанэ̄гэ
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu1: рӯпитанэгаме̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu2: рӯпитанэгы̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu3: рӯпитанэгэ̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl1: [рӯпитанэгув, рӯпитанэгӯв]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl2: рӯпитанэгагы̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl3: рӯпитанэгаганыл
